Connecticut, session 2026, SB00458.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subdivision (9) of subsection (a) of section 10-29a of the
2026 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(9) The Governor shall proclaim the last Friday in September in each
year to be [Indian] Indigenous Peoples' Day, which day shall be suitably
observed in the public schools of the state as a day of commemoration
of [American Indians] Native Americans and their contribution to
American life and civilization.
Sec. 2. Subdivision (133) of subsection (a) of section 10-29a of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(133) The Governor shall proclaim the third [Saturday] Sunday of
September of each year as Lobster Roll Day. Suitable exercises may be
held in the State Capitol and elsewhere as the Governor designates for
the observance of the day.
Sec. 3. Subsection (a) of section 10-29a of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is amended by adding subdivisions (139) to (148),

Substitute Senate Bill No. 458
inclusive, as follows (Effective from passage):
(NEW) (139) The Governor shall proclaim January eleventh of each
year as Hartford Whalers Day, in honor of the first Whalers game played
in the city of Hartford. Suitable exercises may be held in the State Capitol
and elsewhere as the Governor designates for the observance of the day.
(NEW) (140) The Governor shall proclaim February third of each year
as Topical Steroid Withdrawal Awareness Day, to raise public
awareness of this adverse reaction characterized by intense burning,
red, inflamed skin and peeling that occurs after stopping long-term or
high-potency topical steroid creams. Suitable exercises may be held in
the State Capitol and elsewhere as the Governor designates for the
observance of the day.
(NEW) (141) The Governor shall proclaim March fourth of each year
as 6888th Central Postal Directory Battalion Day, to recognize the only
African-American all-female unit sent overseas during World War II to
process millions of pieces of backlogged mail for troops in the European
theater. Suitable exercises may be held in the State Capitol and
elsewhere as the Governor designates for the observance of the day.
(NEW) (142) The Governor shall proclaim March eighth of each year
as Henry Breault Day, to remember the late Medal of Honor recipient
from Putnam who was the first submariner to be presented the Medal
of Honor on March 8, 1924, for his actions aboard a United States
submarine that was sinking, when he returned to the torpedo room to
the rescue of a shipmate and remained trapped in the submarine for
thirty-one hours. Suitable exercises may be held in the State Capitol and
elsewhere as the Governor designates for the observance of the day.
(NEW) (143) The Governor shall proclaim the first day of the Islamic
month of Shawwal, the tenth month of the Islamic lunar calendar of each
year, as Eid al-Fitr, to mark the end of Ramadan. Suitable exercises may
Public Act No. 26-19 2 of 4

Substitute Senate Bill No. 458
be held in the State Capitol and elsewhere as the Governor designates
for the observance of the day.
(NEW) (144) The Governor shall proclaim the month of May of each
year as Progressive Supranuclear Palsy Awareness Month, to raise
public awareness of the associated presentation and available
treatments for this rare, progressive neurodegenerative disorder
affecting movement, balance, vision and speech due to a buildup of
proteins in the brain. Suitable exercises may be held in the State Capitol
and elsewhere as the Governor designates for the observance of the
month.
(NEW) (145) The Governor shall proclaim July seventeenth of each
year as Hiram Bingham IV Day, to remember the late Connecticut
resident who was the Vice Consul in charge of visas at the United States
Consulate in Marseille, France, from 1940 to 1941, and who issued
thousands of visas to refugees and was instrumental in assisting them
in escaping to the United States, at great personal peril. His story stands
as a powerful example of courage and compassion and follows in the
tradition of many who chose humanitarian action during the Holocaust.
Suitable exercises may be held in the State Capitol and elsewhere as the
Governor designates for the observance of the day.
(NEW) (146) The Governor shall proclaim the month of September of
each year as Ovarian Cancer Awareness Month, to raise public
awareness of the associated presentation and available treatments for
ovarian cancer. Suitable exercises may be held in the State Capitol and
elsewhere as the Governor designates for the observance of the month.
(NEW) (147) The Governor shall proclaim September twenty-eighth
of each year as Good Neighbor Day, to combat social isolation and
strengthen community bonds, encourage people to get to know their
neighbors, practice acts of kindness and build safer, more connected
neighborhoods. Suitable exercises may be held in the State Capitol and
Public Act No. 26-19 3 of 4

Substitute Senate Bill No. 458
elsewhere as the Governor designates for the observance of the day.
(NEW) (148) The Governor shall proclaim September thirtieth of each
year as Military Suicide Remembrance and Awareness Day, to honor
veterans and military members lost to suicide, raise awareness of mental
health issues among veterans and military members and raise
awareness of the available resources and supports for them. Suitable
exercises may be held in the State Capitol and elsewhere as the
Governor designates for the observance of the day.
Governor's Action:
Approved May 19, 2026
Public Act No. 26-19 4 of 4